Missouri, session 2026, HB2381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 115, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 115.1600, to read as follows:
115.1600. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Donation", a payment, gift, subscription, loan, advance, deposit, or
anything of value given to a person without consideration;
(2) "Election administration", to participate in any way in the process of
conducting and implementing an election. Election administration for the purposes of
this section does not include post-election canvass, recount, contest, and audit processes;
(3) "Election officer", individuals who administer, implement, or oversee
election-related policies, procedures, or technologies on behalf of any political
subdivision or the secretary of state. Election officers include, but are not limited to,
the secretary of state; any election authority; any member of a redistricting commission;
or any of the aforementioned individual's agents, employees, representatives, or assigns;
(4) "Foreign donation", a donation provided by a foreign national;
(5) "Foreign national", any of the following:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States;
(b) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country or municipality thereof;
(c) A foreign political party; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2381 2
(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or
other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal
place of business in a foreign country;
(6) "Government entity", a state, county, local, or municipal government entity,
or an officer, employee, or volunteer of one of these entities;
(7) "Person", an individual, partnership, association, corporation, organization,
or any other combination or group of individuals.
2. (1) A government entity shall not solicit, accept, or use any funds or in-kind
goods or services for election administration if those funds or in-kind goods or services
are donated directly or indirectly by any person other than a government entity. An
election officer may solicit, accept, or use funds or in-kind goods or services of de
minimis value.
(2) Subject to the exception in subsection 3 of this subsection, a government
entity or election officer shall not join the membership of any person, participate in any
program, or purchase any services from any person unless the person complies with the
following certification requirements:
(a) The certification shall state that the person:
a. Has not directly or indirectly financed election administration;
b. Does not have any staff or board members who have worked for, consulted
with, or been employed by a person described by this subdivision within the last ten
years unless such organization consisted of government officials; and
c. Has been certified as being free of direct or indirect foreign donations.
(b) The certification required by paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be:
a. Renewed on an annual basis;
b. Updated within five business days of the person obtaining information
unknown at the time of the initial certification as described in this subdivision; and
c. Dated and sworn by the person under penalty of perjury.
3. (1) If, in his or her private capacity, an election officer joins or considers
joining the membership of a person, or participates or considers participating in any
program described by subsection 2 of this section, the election officer shall disclose his
or her participation or membership, or potential participation or membership, and to
have participation or potential participation or membership considered in a public
hearing, and disclosed on his or her public website as provided by this section.
(2) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be:
(a) Conspicuous, publicly accessible, and publicly viewable;
(b) At least 14-point Times New Roman font, and in a contrasting color from the
background of the website;

HB 2381 3
(c) Enclosed inside a box, separated from other text and graphics; and
(d) Displayed on the homepage of the election officer's website, reasonably close
to the top of the page.
(3) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall state:
(a) The full name and title of the election officer;
(b) The date that the election officer participated in the program or joined the
person or participated in the program or is scheduled to begin participation in the
program;
(c) The full name of the program or person;
(d) An accurate description of the nature of the program or person;
(e) A certification that the person or program has not been, directly or
indirectly, the recipient of foreign donations, a statement that the person or program has
been the recipient of foreign donations, or a statement that the person or program has
not submitted said certification; and
(f) The date of any public hearing at which membership or participation in the
program is to be considered.
(4) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall also
include a link to an electronic document containing all resources or documents received
by the election officer from the person or program, along with the disclosure of any
known funding for the program known to the officer. This list of resources shall be
updated within ten business days of receipt as resources, documents, and other
materials are provided or made available.
(5) If the election officer does not have a public website, the disclosure shall be
included on the official homepage of the website most closely associated with the election
officer, including that of his or her superior or supervisor. If no website or homepage
can be ascertained, the disclosure shall be submitted to the secretary of state for
inclusion on the secretary of state's website in a conspicuous manner.
(6) Any disclosure made pursuant to this subsection shall remain posted and
publicly accessible for a period beginning not less than thirty days prior to joining, and
ending not less than one hundred eighty days after membership ends.
(7) In creating and posting any disclosure pursuant to this subsection, the
election officer is certifying under penalty of perjury that the information contained
within the disclosure is true and accurate.
4. Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor. If conduct that constitutes
an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under any other law, the actor
may be prosecuted under this section, the other law, or both.

HB 2381 4
5. Any registered voter in this state may bring a cause of action to enforce this
section.
6. Any existing or future ordinance enacted or adopted by any political
subdivision that is in conflict with this section is void.
✔